Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1212
Manufacturers; retailers; temporary numbering; certificate; fee.

A person engaged in the manufacture or sale of vessels of a type otherwise required to be numbered under the State Boat Act, upon application to the county treasurer of the county in which the applicant resides or the business location of the manufacturer or retailer on forms prescribed by the commission, may obtain certificates of number for use in the testing or demonstrating of such vessels upon payment of a fee of not less than forty dollars and not more than forty-six dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327, for each registration. Certificates of number so issued may be used by the applicant in the testing or demonstrating of vessels by temporary placement of the numbers assigned by such certificate on the vessel so tested or demonstrated. Such temporary placement of numbers shall otherwise be as prescribed by the act.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 35;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 395;

Laws 2001, LB 131, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 20.